Hawaii statutes.
§321-27 Sanitation and environmental health
special fund. (a) There is established within the department of health
the sanitation and environmental health special fund into which shall be
deposited all moneys collected from fees for permits, licenses, inspections,
various certificates, variances, investigations, and reviews, pursuant to
sections 321-11.5(c) and 321-15.

(b) Moneys in the fund shall be expended by
the department to partially fund the operating costs of program activities and
functions authorized pursuant to section 321-11 to enhance the capacity of
sanitation and environmental health programs to:

(1) Improve public outreach efforts and consultations
to regulated businesses and industries;

(2) Educate the public, staff, and regulated businesses
and industries;

(3) Plan for future growth and expansion to meet
emerging needs;

(4) Provide training opportunities to ensure the
maintenance of professional competence among sanitation and environmental
health staff and administrators; and

(5) Conduct program activities and functions of the
sanitation branch, including permit issuance, inspections, and enforcement and
the hiring of additional inspectors;

provided that for environmental health programs, not
more than $140,000 of the fund may be used during any fiscal year for fund
administration, including the hiring of not more than two full-time equivalent
personnel, and the purchase of office and electronic equipment.

(c) Any amount in the fund in excess of $1,500,000
on June 30 of each year shall be deposited into the general fund.

(d) The department of health shall submit a
report to the legislature concerning the status of the sanitation and environmental
health special fund, including:

(1) The amount of moneys taken in by and expended from
the fund; and

(2) The sources of receipts and uses of expenditures,

not less than twenty days prior to the convening of
each regular session. [L 1994, c 169, §§2, 9; am L 1996, c 164, §1; am L 1998,
c 311, §§15, 16; am L 1999, c 120, §4; am L 2010, c 176, §4]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next